fr: Format de pare-soleil: Pliage en accordéon; Panneau modulaire; Pop-up (acier à ressort); Rétractable (enrouleur); À enrouler; Feuille de film électrostatique; Style parapluie; Chaussette de fenêtre (à enfiler); Autre
tr: Güneşlik tipi: Akordeon katlama; Modüler panel; Açılır (yaylı çelik); Geri sarılabilir (stor); Rulo; Statik film tabakası; Şemsiye stili; Pencere kılıfı (geçmeli); Diğer
zh-TW: 遮陽簾樣式: 摺疊式; 模組化面板; 彈出式 (彈簧鋼); 伸縮式 (滾筒); 捲起式; 靜電薄膜; 傘式; 車窗套 (套入式); 其他
ro-RO: Stil de parasolar auto: Pliere tip acordeon; Panou modular; Pop-up (oțel arc); Retractabil (rulou); Rulou; Folie statică; Stil umbrelă; Husă fereastră (tip șosetă); Altele
ko: 햇빛 가리개 방식: 아코디언 접이식; 모듈형 패널; 팝업형(스프링 스틸); 접이식(롤러); 롤업형; 정전기 필름 시트; 우산형; 창문 덮개(슬립온); 기타
pt-PT: Estilo do para-sol: Dobra em acordeão; Painel modular; Pop-up (aço de mola); Retrátil (rolo); De enrolar; Folha de película estática; Estilo guarda-chuva; Cobertura de janela (de enfiar); Outro
bg-BG: Стил на сенник: Сгъване тип акордеон; Модулен панел; Сгъваем (пружинна стомана); Прибиращ се (ролетен); Навиващ се; Статично фолио; Тип чадър; Чорап за прозорец (нанизващ се); Друго
ja: サンシェードスタイル: アコーディオン折り; モジュラーパネル; ポップアップ (スプリングスチール); 格納式 (ローラー); ロールアップ; 静電気フィルムシート; 傘スタイル; ウィンドウソックス (スリップオン); その他
it: Stile della tendina parasole: Pieghevole a fisarmonica; Pannello modulare; Pop-up (acciaio armonico); Retrattile (a rullo); Arrotolabile; Pellicola statica; A ombrello; A calza (da infilare); Altro
zh-CN: 遮阳挡样式: 手风琴式折叠; 模块化面板; 弹出式（弹簧钢）; 可伸缩（卷筒式）; 卷起式; 静电贴膜; 伞式; 车窗套（套入式）; 其他
hr-HR: Stil sjenila za sunce: Sklapanje u obliku harmonike; Modularna ploča; Pop-up (opružni čelik); Na izvlačenje (na rolu); Na rolanje; Elektrostatska folija; U obliku kišobrana; Navlaka za prozor (na navlačenje); Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog senčnika: Harmonikasto zlaganje; Modularna plošča; Samopostavljivo (vzmetno jeklo); Izvlečno (na rolo); Na rolo; Statična folija; V obliki dežnika; Okenska prevleka (natakljiva); Drugo
nl: Zonwering stijl: Accordionvouw; Modulair paneel; Pop-up (verenstaal); Uitschuifbaar (rol); Oprolbaar; Statische folie; Paraplustijl; Raamhoes (slip-on); Overig
lt-LT: Apsaugos nuo saulės tipas: Susilankstantis (armonikos tipo); Modulinis skydelis; Išsiskleidžiantis (spyruoklinio plieno); Ištraukiamas (roletas); Suvyniojamas; Statinės plėvelės lakštas; Skėčio stiliaus; Užmaunamas lango tinklelis; Kitas
es: Estilo del parasol: Plegado en acordeón; Panel modular; Desplegable (acero para resortes); Retráctil (enrollable); Enrollable; Lámina de película estática; Estilo paraguas; Funda para ventana (deslizante); Otro
da: Solskærmstil: Harmonikafoldning; Modulært panel; Pop op (fjederstål); Indtrækkelig (rulle); Rul op; Statisk folie; Paraplystil; Rudesok (trækkes over); Andet
cs: Styl sluneční clony: Skládací do harmoniky; Modulární panel; Pop-up (pružinová ocel); Stahovací (roleta); Svinovací; Fólie se statickým přilnutím; Ve tvaru deštníku; Okenní návlek (navlékací); Jiné
th: สไตล์ร่มกันแดด: พับแบบหีบเพลง; แผงแบบแยกส่วน; ป๊อปอัพ (เหล็กสปริง); แบบดึงกลับได้ (ม้วน); แบบม้วน; แผ่นฟิล์มติดกระจกด้วยไฟฟ้าสถิต; ทรงร่ม; แบบสวมกระจกหน้าต่าง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Protetor solar estilo: Dobra sanfonada; Painel modular; Pop-up (aço mola); Retrátil (rolo); De enrolar; Folha de filme estático; Estilo guarda-chuva; Capa de janela (de vestir); Outros
sv: Solskyddsstil: Dragspelsvikning; Modulär panel; Pop-up (fjäderstål); Infällbar (rulle); Upprullningsbar; Statisk film; Paraplystil; Fönstersocka (träs över); Övrigt
pl: Styl osłony przeciwsłonecznej: Składana harmonijkowo; Panel modułowy; Pop-up (stal sprężynowa); Zwijana (roleta); Zwijana; Folia elektrostatyczna; W kształcie parasolki; Siatka na okno (wsuwana); Inny
el: Τύπος σκιάστρου: Δίπλωμα ακορντεόν; Αρθρωτό πάνελ; Pop-up (ελατηριωτός χάλυβας); Αναδιπλούμενο (ρολό); Roll-up; Φύλλο στατικής μεμβράνης; Σε στυλ ομπρέλας; Κάλυμμα παραθύρου (φορετό); Άλλο
en: Sun shade style: Accordion fold; Modular panel; Pop-up (spring steel); Retractable (roller); Roll-up; Static film sheet; Umbrella style; Window sock (slip-on); Other
nb: Solskjermstil: Trekkspillfold; Modulært panel; Pop-up (fjærstål); Uttrekkbar (rulle); Opprullbar; Statisk filmark; Paraply-stil; Vindussokk (trekk på); Annet
hu: Napernyő stílusa: Harmonikára hajtott; Moduláris panel; Pop-up (rugóacél); Behúzható (rolós); Felcsavarható; Elektrosztatikus fólia; Esernyő alakú; Ablakra húzható árnyékoló; Egyéb
fi: Aurinkosuojan tyyli: Haitaritaite; Modulaarinen paneeli; Pop-up (jousiteräs); Sisäänkelautuva (rulla); Rullattava; Staattinen kalvo; Sateenvarjomainen; Ikkunasukka (pujotettava); Muu
vi: Kiểu mái che nắng: Gấp kiểu đàn xếp; Tấm mô-đun; Tự bung (thép lò xo); Có thể thu gọn (con lăn); Cuộn lại; Tấm phim tĩnh điện; Kiểu ô; Bọc cửa sổ (dạng tròng); Khác
de: Art des Sonnenschutzes: Akkordeon-Faltung; Modulares Panel; Pop-up (Federstahl); Einziehbar (Rollo); Aufrollbar; Statische Folie; Regenschirm-Stil; Fensterbezug (zum Überziehen); Sonstige
ru: Стиль солнцезащитного экрана: Складная («гармошка»); Модульная панель; Складная (пружинная сталь); Выдвижная (рулонная); Сворачивающаяся; Статическая пленка; В виде зонта; Оконный чехол (надеваемый); Другое
sk-SK: Štýl slnečnej clony: Skladanie typu akordeón; Modulárny panel; Rozbaľovacia (pružinová oceľ); Zaťahovacia (roletová); Rolovacia; Statická fólia; Štýl dáždnika; Okenný návlek (nasúvací); Iné